Missouri, session 2026, HB1767.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 160, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto four new sections, to
be known as sections 160.1052, 160.1053, 160.1054, and 160.1055, to read as follows:
160.1052. 1. Sections 160.1052 to 160.1055 shall be known and may be cited as
the "Missouri Educators and Parental Empowerment and Rights Act".
2. As used in sections 160.1052 to 160.1055, the following terms mean:
(1) "Local educational agency" or "LEA", each:
(a) School district as defined in section 160.011;
(b) Charter school as described in section 160.400; and
(c) Virtual school as described in section 161.670;
(2) "Parent", a child's parent, legal guardian, or other person having charge,
control, or custody of the child.
3. The general assembly hereby recognizes that:
(1) The collaboration of both parents and teachers has a profound effect on the
educational success of Missouri's children;
(2) Education is essential to the preservation of the rights and liberties of the
people;
(3) Considering that parents are the first teachers of their children and are
uniquely qualified to understand and advocate for their children, the state recognizes
the importance of parents in the education of their children; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1767 2
(4) Considering the years of education and continuous updating of knowledge
that teachers undertake and achieve, it is important that teachers be given the respect
such teachers have earned and deserve.
160.1053. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Parents' Bill
of Rights".
2. To foster and maintain collaboration between parents and teachers, parents
shall have the following rights under this section:
(1) The right to receive information, upon request, regarding what their minor
child is being taught in school including, but not limited to, curricula adopted under
section 160.514;
(2) The right to review such curricula, upon request, free from any requirement
to agree to a nondisclosure agreement or other similar form, as allowed by law;
(3) The right to receive information, upon request, about who is teaching their
minor child including, but not limited to, guest lecturers and outside presenters;
(4) The right to receive information, upon request, about individuals and
organizations receiving LEA contracts and funding in the LEA in which their minor
child is enrolled, except that no personally identifiable information about any student
shall be released;
(5) The right to visit the school their minor child attends during school hours in
accordance with reasonable regulations created under section 160.1055;
(6) The right to view and, upon request, receive a copy of all school records,
medical or otherwise, concerning their minor child, in accordance with state and federal
law;
(7) The right to receive information, upon request, about the collection of their
minor child's data and the transmission of such data to entities outside the LEA;
(8) The right to have an LEA governing board that is open, transparent, and
accountable to the patrons of the LEA under state and federal laws;
(9) The right to be informed regarding situations affecting their minor child's
safety in school, in accordance with section 160.1055;
(10) The right to provide authorization for their minor child to participate in
field trips; and
(11) The right to be free from their minor child being encouraged or
experiencing any attempt at coercion to withhold information from such minor child's
parents by an LEA employee, except that any such employee required to report
suspected abuse or neglect under sections 210.109 to 210.183 may encourage a minor
child to withhold information where disclosure could reasonably result in abuse or
neglect.

HB 1767 3
160.1054. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Educators'
Bill of Rights".
2. To foster and maintain collaboration between teachers and parents, each
teacher has the following rights under this section:
(1) The right to be free from physical abuse from a student. Such abuse is
grounds for the suspension or expulsion of the student as provided in chapter 167;
(2) The right to be free from physical abuse from a parent and to be protected
from oral, written, or electronically generated threats of harm. Such abuse is grounds
for the prohibition of the physical presence of the perpetrator of such abuse on the
LEA's property and at the LEA's events and may result in other legal actions taken by
such teacher;
(3) The right to be evaluated for competency by an administrator under board
policy and, upon request, to be assigned a peer mentor to observe and coach the teacher;
(4) The right to exercise the freedom of speech, religion, and the expression of
such teacher's opinions as is guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States;
(5) The right to be treated with civility and respect as a professional;
(6) The right to be given regularly scheduled preparation time during contract
hours;
(7) The right to teach protected by official immunity, as provided by state law,
and to be covered by LEA insurance for work-related duties;
(8) The right to have the opportunity to implement a discipline plan in the
classroom as allowed in section 160.1055 and to have the opportunity to provide the
administration with such teacher's professional opinion regarding the discipline of a
student;
(9) The right to be considered a professional, with all the appropriate rights,
responsibilities, and privileges afforded to other recognized professions, in accordance
with section 168.011;
(10) The right to teach in a safe, secure, and orderly environment that is
conducive to learning and to report any concerns regarding the safety and security of
the teaching environment and receive a response from the LEA;
(11) The right to intervene for the protection of pupils in incidents of school
violence and be entitled to all defenses to criminal charges available to the intervenor
under chapter 563; and
(12) If such teacher is a beginning teacher, the right to receive leadership and
support in accordance with beginning teacher assistance programs as provided in state
law.

HB 1767 4
160.1055. 1. Each local educational agency shall develop policies and procedures
for such LEA to follow to accommodate and assist parents and teachers in the exercise
of the rights described in sections 160.1052 to 160.1055.
2. Each LEA's governing board shall affirm the board's commitment to ensuring
sufficient and effective accountability and transparency to parents in the LEA's
jurisdiction by adopting policies that:
(1) Recognize and affirm the protected right of parents to guide the education of
their minor child;
(2) Encourage communication between parents and the LEA relating to parental
rights and parental concerns about their minor child's education and educational
experience through the LEA's community engagement initiatives required under
162.058; and
(3) Collaborate with parents to identify ways in which parents can exercise
parental rights and communicate such ways to parents in a clear, consistent manner that
can be easily understood by all parents.
3. Each local educational agency shall notify parents in a timely manner if their
child is involved in a safety incident in which a school employee is charged with a crime.
4. Each local educational agency shall provide prompt notification to parents of
any serious disciplinary incidents involving their child and shall offer a meeting or
conference to discuss the behavior and outline steps for correction and improvement.
5. (1) Each local educational agency shall adopt reasonable procedures for
parents to follow when visiting their minor child during school hours.
(2) Each local educational agency shall adopt reasonable procedures for parents
to follow:
(a) During an emergency in which the safety of the students requires:
a. A lockdown to limit exposure of building occupants to an imminent hazard or
threat; or
b. A lockout to prevent an outside hazard or threat from entering the building;
or
(b) When such local educational agency is required to prohibit an individual
from having any interaction with a minor child due to an order entered under any
provision of state or federal law restricting or prohibiting such individual from
interacting with such minor child or the LEA has otherwise prohibited the individual
from accessing school property or events.
6. (1) Teachers, school administrators, parents, and students shall be fully
informed of the rights conferred upon parents and teachers under sections 160.1052 to

HB 1767 5
160.1055. Each LEA shall provide a physical or electronic copy of sections 160.1052 to
160.1055 to each parent, teacher, and student at the beginning of each school year.
(2) Each local educational agency shall post the rights listed in sections 160.1052
to 160.1055 on such LEA's website or provide a printed copy if no website exists.
7. (1) Each local educational agency shall adopt, enforce, publicly post, and
annually review a code of student conduct as described in sections 160.1052 to 160.1055.
(2) Such code of conduct shall promote safe, respectful, and orderly learning
environments by reinforcing teacher authority in maintaining classroom discipline and
enhancing parental involvement in student behavioral issues and shall set forth
expectations for behavior consistent with ethical responsibility, community standards,
and regard for school authority.
(3) Each local educational agency shall adopt such code of student conduct for
the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years.
(4) The state department of elementary and secondary education may offer
guidance and technical assistance to local educational agencies to ensure compliance.
The department shall not impose undue burdens or mandates on such LEAs.
8. The code of student conduct required under subsection 7 of this section shall:
(1) Reinforce respect for teachers, administrators, and staff, emphasizing that
willful disobedience or disregard toward school personnel is not tolerated;
(2) Promote high expectations of personal responsibility, encouraging students to
uphold values such as honesty, diligence, and civility;
(3) Include measures to address and correct disruptive behavior promptly,
ensuring that teachers have the necessary authority and support to remove students
from classrooms when warranted, in accordance with training provided by the LEA;
(4) Outline a system of graduated consequences for misconduct, balanced by
opportunities for students to develop personal resilience and reflect on their actions
through LEA-approved interventions;
(5) Require parental notification and involvement in significant disciplinary
actions, ensuring that parents have timely information and opportunities to engage with
teachers and administrators; and
(6) Clearly prohibit any policy or program that differentiates treatment of
students primarily on the basis of race alone, ensuring that all disciplinary measures are
applied equally and fairly to every student.
9. (1) A local educational agency may, at such LEA's discretion and with the
LEA's governing board's approval, incorporate evidence-based training for teachers
and counselors on strategies to guide students toward personal resilience.
(2) Such strategies may include:

HB 1767 6
(a) Encouraging personal responsibility and self-management;
(b) Providing students with opportunities to develop coping skills, conflict
resolution techniques, and appropriate responses to authority; and
(c) Using school counselors or other qualified personnel to offer supportive
interventions that emphasize respect for self and others, problem solving, and
perseverance.
(3) The content and method of delivering such strategies shall not reference or
require any training or curriculum primarily focused on race, gender, or other similar
classifications. Such strategies shall emphasize universal community standards that
benefit all students equally.
10. Each local educational agency shall ensure that teachers and staff are trained
in methods to maintain order, encourage compliance, foster civility, and encourage
personal responsibility.
11. Each local educational agency shall make efforts to facilitate parental
engagement through regular communication, opportunities for parents to review and
understand the policy handbook, and the provision of resources that support ethical
responsibility and community standards at home.
12. Each LEA's governing board shall adopt such policies and procedures
required by this section for the 2027-28 school year and all subsequent school years.
13. No LEA shall establish policies that prevent a parent or teacher from
exercising the applicable rights listed in sections 160.1052 to 160.1055 or any other
provision of law.
14. No provision of sections 160.1052 to 160.1055 shall be construed to supersede
any other federal or state law or any regulation or policy adopted by the state
department of elementary and secondary education or the state board of education.
15. No provision of sections 160.1052 to 160.1055 shall be construed to supersede
100 any LEA's order, ordinance, or policy relating to the discipline of students.
✔